zh-TW: 布料銷售形式: 依公尺計; 依碼計; 預先裁切塊; 捲/疋; 樣布/樣品; 其他
pt-BR: Formato de venda do tecido: Por metro; Por jarda; Peça pré-cortada; Rolo/peça; Amostra; Outros
de: Stoffverkaufsformat: Pro Meter; Pro Yard; Vorgeschnittenes Stück; Rolle/Ballen; Stoffmuster/Probe; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Format prodaje tkanin: Na meter; Na jard; Vnaprej odrezan kos; Rola/bala; Vzorec; Drugo
da: Det format, som stoffet sælges i: Pr. meter; Pr. yard; Forudskåret stykke; Rulle/stofrulle; Stofprøve; Andet
el: Μορφή πώλησης υφασμάτων: Ανά μέτρο; Ανά γιάρδα; Προκομμένο κομμάτι; Ρολό/Τόπι; Δείγμα; Άλλο
sk-SK: Formát predaja tkanín: Na metre; Na yardy; Predrezaný kus; Rolka/balík; Vzorka/ukážka; Iný
tr: Kumaş satış biçimi: Metrelik; Yardalık; Önceden kesilmiş parça; Rulo/top; Renk kartelası/numune; Diğer
th: รูปแบบการขายผ้า: ทีละเมตร; ทีละหลา; ชิ้นที่ตัดไว้แล้ว; ม้วน/ม้วนพับ; เศษผ้า/ตัวอย่าง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Formatul de vânzare a țesăturilor: La metru; La yard; Bucată pretăiată; Rolă/balot; Mostră/eșantion; Altele
hu: Szövet értékesítési forma: Méterenként; Yardonként; Előre vágott darab; Tekercs/vég; Színminta/minta; Egyéb
ko: 패브릭 판매 형식: 미터 단위; 야드 단위; 사전 재단 조각; 롤/볼트; 견본/샘플; 기타
nb: Format for salg av stoff: Per meter; Per yard; Ferdigklippet stykke; Rull/stoffrull; Prøvelapp; Annet
lt-LT: Audinio pardavimo formatas: Metrais; Jardais; Iškirptas gabalas; Ritinys / rietimas; Pavyzdys; Kita
ja: 生地販売フォーマット: 1メートル単位; 1ヤード単位; プレカット生地; ロール/反物; スワッチ/サンプル; その他
cs: Prodávaný formát látek: Na metry; Na yardy; Předem nastříhaný kus; Role/návin; Vzorek; Jiné
vi: Hình thức bán vải: Theo mét; Theo yard; Mảnh cắt sẵn; Cuộn; Mẫu vải/mẫu; Khác
bg-BG: Формат за продажба на платове: На метър; На ярд; Предварително изрязано парче; Ролка/топ; Мостра/пример; Друго
pt-PT: Formato de venda de tecido: Por metro; Por jarda; Peça pré-cortada; Rolo/peça; Amostra; Outro
fi: Kankaan myyntimuoto: Metreittäin; Jaardeittain; Valmiiksi leikattu pala; Rulla/pakka; Tilkku/näyte; Muu
en: Fabric selling format: By the meter; By the yard; Pre-cut piece; Roll/bolt; Swatch/sample; Other
ru: Формат продажи ткани: По метражу; Ярдами; Готовый отрез; Рулон/штука; Лоскут/образец; Другое
sv: Format för försäljning av tyg: Per meter; Per yard; Färdigklippt bit; Rulle/bal; Tygprov; Övrigt
es: Formato de venta de telas: Por metro; Por yarda; Pieza precortada; Rollo/pieza de tela; Muestra; Otro
fr: Mode de vente du tissu: Au mètre; Au yard; Pièce prédécoupée; Rouleau/pièce; Échantillon; Autre
hr-HR: Format prodaje tkanine: Po metru; Po jardu; Unaprijed izrezan komad; Rola/bala; Uzorak; Ostalo
pl: Format sprzedaży tkanin: Na metry; Na jardy; Z góry docięty kawałek; Rolka / belka; Próbka; Inne
zh-CN: 面料销售规格: 按米; 按码; 预裁剪件; 卷/匹; 色板/样品; 其他
nl: Stof verkoopvorm: Per meter; Per yard; Voorgesneden stuk; Rol/stofrol; Staal/monster; Overig
it: Formato di vendita dei tessuti: Al metro; Alla iarda; Pezzo pretagliato; Rotolo/pezza; Campione di tessuto; Altro